Montana, session 2025, HB782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 76-1-211, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-1-211. Membership of county planning board. (1) County planning boards consist of not less
than five members appointed by the board of county commissioners. At least one member of a county planning
board existing on or formed after July 1, 1973, must may be a member of the governing board of a conservation
district as provided for in chapter 15, an associate member of a conservation district designated by the
governing board of a conservation district, or a member of a state cooperative grazing district if officers of either
of the districts or the designated associate member of a conservation district reside resides in the county.
(2) If a city or town subsequently becomes represented on the county planning board pursuant to
76-1-111, additional members of the planning board representing the cities or towns must be appointed by the
respective city councils."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 782